Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201023-1212
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 23-1212 to 23-1222, unless the context
otherwise requires:

(1) County attorney shall mean the county attorney of a county
in this state whether such position is elective or appointive and regardless
of whether such position is full time or part time;

(2) Deputy county attorney shall mean an attorney employed
by a county in this state for the purpose of assisting the county attorney
in carrying out his or her responsibilities regardless of whether such position
is full time or part time;

(3) Council shall mean the Nebraska County Attorney Standards
Advisory Council;

(4) Attorney General shall mean the Nebraska Attorney General;

(5) Commission shall mean the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice; and

(6) Continuing legal education, including instruction providing
a working knowledge of electronic speed measurement principles and instruction
on the investigation and prosecution of crimes against children, shall mean
that type of legal education, including instruction providing a working knowledge
of electronic speed measurement principles and instruction on the investigation
and prosecution of crimes against children, which has application to and seeks
to maintain and improve the skills of the county attorney and deputy county
attorney in carrying out the responsibilities of his or her office or position.

Laws 1980, LB 790, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 1246, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB671, § 1.